Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1047.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-11.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-11.1 entitled
"Investments by Domestic Insurance Companies" is hereby repealed.
27-11.1-3. Maximum investments in investments currently reported in Schedule BA
of the annual statement blank.
A domestic insurance company may invest in those assets, which are currently reported in
Schedule BA of its annual statement; provided, that those investments do not exceed in the
aggregate ten percent (10%) of the company’s admitted assets. Those investments may include, but
are not limited to, the following types of investments:
(1) All loans on or investments in oil and gas production payments;
(2) All transportation equipment;
(3) Timber deeds;
(4) Mineral rights carried as admitted assets;
(5) Motor vehicle trust certificates; and
(6) Any other class of admitted investment not clearly includible in other statement
schedules.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002899
========